Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1130.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5 of the act of November 29, 2006 (P.L.1435, No.156), known as the Public Utility Confidential Security Information Disclosure Protection Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Prohibition.(a) General rule.--[An] Except as provided under subsection (b), an agency shall not release, publish or otherwise disclose a public utility record or portion thereof which contains confidential security information, in accordance with the provisions of this act.(b) Exception.--(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an agency may, after 123456789101112131415161718 notification and consultation with the public utility, disclose a public utility record or portion thereof which contains confidential security information, in accordance with the provisions of this act, that is necessary for construction, renovation or remodeling work on any public building or project. Release or disclosure of such records or portions thereof for these purposes does not constitute prohibited disclosure under subsection (a) and does not result in such records or portions thereof becoming public records subject to the provisions of the act of June 21, 1957 (P.L.390, No.212), referred to as the Right-to-Know Law.(2) The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply to the following:(i) A public utility record or portion thereof which contains confidential security information that is related to an accident investigation conducted by the National Transportation Safety Board.(ii) (Reserved).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1130PN1386 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819